Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0691.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Locked and sealed" is defined in section 14. (b) "Major political party" is defined in section 16. (c) "Metal seal" or "seal" is defined in section 14a. (d) "Name that was formally changed" means a name changed by a proceeding under chapter XI of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 711.1 to 711.3, or former 1915 PA 314, or through a similar, statutorily sanctioned procedure under the law of another state or country. (e) "Odd year general election" means the election held on the November regular election date in an odd numbered year. (f) "Odd year primary election" means the election held on the August May regular election date in an odd numbered year. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (g) "Primary" or "primary election" is defined in section 7. (h) "Regular ballot" means a ballot that is issued to a voter on election day at a polling place location. (i) "Qualified elector" is defined in section 10. (j) "Qualified voter file" is defined in section 509m. (k) "Regular election" means an election held on a regular election date to elect an individual to, or nominate an individual for, elective office in the regular course of the terms of that elective office. (l) "Regular election date" means 1 of the dates established as a regular election date in section 641. (m) "Residence" is defined in section 11. Sec. 52. A general primary election of all political parties shall must be held in every election precinct in this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election in which a governor is to be elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party shall vote for party candidates for the office of governor. This section shall does not apply to political parties required to nominate candidates at caucuses or conventions. Sec. 53. To obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of governor under a particular party heading upon on the official primary ballots, there shall must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in this state as determined under section 544f. Nominating petitions shall must be signed by at least 100 registered resident electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of the this state. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Nominating petitions shall must be in the form as prescribed in section 544c. Until December 31, 2013, nominating petitions shall be received by the secretary of state for filing in accordance with this act up to 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, nominating Nominating petitions shall must be received by the secretary of state for filing in accordance with this act up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. Sec. 92. A general primary election of all political parties shall must be held in every election precinct in this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party may vote for a party candidate for the office of United States senator, Senator, to be filled at said the election. : Provided, That this This section shall does not apply to political parties required to nominate candidates at caucuses or conventions. : Provided further, That no A nomination for the office of United States senator shall Senator must not be made unless such the official is to be elected at the next succeeding general November election. Sec. 93. In order for the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of United States senator Senator to appear under a particular party heading on the official primary ballot, a nominating petition shall must be filed with the secretary of state. The nominating petition shall have been must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing within this state as determined under section 544f. The nominating petition shall must be signed by at least 100 qualified and registered electors in each of at least 1/2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the congressional districts of this state. Nominating petitions shall must be in the form as prescribed in section 544c. Until December 31, 2013, the nominating petition shall be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, the The nominating petition shall must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. Sec. 132. A general primary election of all political parties shall must be held in every election precinct in this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party within every congressional district shall vote for party candidates for the office of representative Representative in congress Congress to be filled at said the election. : Provided, That this This section shall does not apply to political parties required to nominate candidates at caucuses or conventions. Sec. 133. In order for the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of representative Representative in congress Congress to appear under a particular party heading on the official primary ballot in the election precincts of a congressional district, a nominating petition shall have been must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the district as determined under section 544f. Until December 31, 2013, if the congressional district comprises more than 1 county, the nominating petition shall be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 2014, if If the congressional district comprises more than 1 county, the nominating petition shall must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. Until December 31, 2013, if the congressional district is within 1 county, the nominating petition shall be filed with the county clerk of that county no later than 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, if If the congressional district is within 1 county, the nominating petition shall must be filed with the county clerk of that county no later than 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. Nominating petitions shall must be in the form as prescribed in section 544c. Sec. 162. A general primary election of all political parties shall must be held in every election precinct in this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party within every senatorial district and every representative district shall vote for party candidates for the offices of state senator and representative , to be filled at the November election. : Provided, That this This section shall does not apply to political parties required to nominate candidates at caucuses or conventions. Sec. 163. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of state senator or representative under a particular party heading upon on the official primary ballots in the various election precincts of a district, there must be filed nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the district as determined under section 544f. If the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 district comprises more than 1 county, the nominating petitions must be filed with the secretary of state. If the district comprises 1 county or less, the nominating petitions must be filed with the county clerk of that county. Nominating petitions must be in the form prescribed in section 544c. The secretary of state and the various county clerks shall receive nominating petitions for filing in accordance with this act up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. (2) In lieu Instead of filing a nominating petition, a nonrefundable filing fee of $100.00 may be paid to the county clerk or, for a candidate in a district comprising more than 1 county, to the secretary of state. Payment of the fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The fee must be deposited in the general fund of the candidate's county of residence and must be used only for the purchase and maintenance of voting equipment. Sec. 192. A general primary election of all political parties shall must be held in every county of this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before the general November election at which the officers named in section 191 of this act are to be elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party may vote for party candidates for the offices. This section shall does not apply to political parties required to nominate candidates at caucuses or conventions. Sec. 193. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for an office named in section 191 under a particular party heading 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 upon on the official primary ballots, there must be filed with the county clerk nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing within the county as determined under section 544f. Nominating petitions must be in the form prescribed in section 544c. The county clerk shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. (2) To obtain the printing of the name of a candidate of a political party under the particular party's heading upon on the primary election ballots in the various voting precincts of the county, there may be filed by the candidate, in lieu the candidate may file, instead of filing nomination petitions, a nonrefundable filing fee of $100.00 to be paid to the county clerk. Payment of the fee and certification of the candidate's name paying the fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The fee must be deposited in the general fund of the county and must be used only for the purchase and maintenance of voting equipment. Sec. 253. A general primary election of all political parties shall must be held on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election in which county road commissioners are elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party may vote for party candidates for the office of county road commissioner. Sec. 254. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for the office of county road commissioner under a particular party heading upon on the official primary ballots, there must be filed 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 with the county clerk of the county nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and registered electors residing within the county as determined under section 544f. Nominating petitions must be in the form prescribed in section 544c. The county clerk shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary in which county road commissioners are to be elected. (2) To obtain the printing of the name of a candidate of a political party under the particular party's heading upon on the primary election ballots in the various voting precincts of the county, there may be filed by each candidate, in lieu each candidate may file, instead of filing nominating petitions, a nonrefundable filing fee of $100.00 to be paid to the county clerk. Payment of the fee and certification of the name of the candidate paying the fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The fee must be deposited in the general fund of the county and must be used only for the purchase and maintenance of voting equipment. Sec. 345. A primary of all political parties shall must be held in every organized township of this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered electors of each political party may vote for party candidates for township offices. Sec. 349. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of an individual as a candidate for nomination by a political party for a township office under the particular party heading upon on the official primary ballots, there must be filed with the township clerk nominating petitions signed by a number of qualified and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 registered electors residing within the township as determined under section 544f. Nominating petitions must be in the form prescribed in section 544c. The township clerk shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. (2) To obtain the printing of the name of a candidate of a political party under the particular party's heading upon on the primary election ballots in the various voting precincts of the township, there may be filed by the candidate, in lieu the candidate may file, instead of filing nominating petitions, a nonrefundable filing fee of $100.00 to be paid to the township clerk. Payment of the fee and certification of the candidate's name paying the fee are governed by the same provisions as in the case of nominating petitions. The fee must be deposited in the general fund of the township and must be used only for the purchase and maintenance of voting equipment. (3) Within Not later than 4 days after the last day for filing nominating petitions or a filing fee, the township clerk shall deliver to the county clerk a list setting forth the name, address, and political affiliation and office sought of each candidate who has qualified for a position on the primary ballot. Sec. 370. (1) Except as provided in section 370a or subsection (2), if a vacancy occurs in an elective or appointive township office, the vacancy must be filled by appointment by the township board, and the individual appointed shall hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term. (2) If 1 or more vacancies occur in an elective township office that cause the number of members serving on the township board to be less than the minimum number of township board members 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 that is required to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business by the township board, the board of county election commissioners shall make temporary appointment of the number of township board members required to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business by the township board. An official appointed under this subsection shall hold the office only until the official's successor is elected or appointed and qualified. An official who is temporarily appointed under this subsection shall not vote on the appointment of himself or herself that official to an elective or appointive township office. (3) If a township official submits a written resignation from an elective township office, for circumstances other than a resignation related to a recall election, that specifies a date and time when the resignation is effective, the township board, within 30 days before that effective date and time, may appoint an individual to fill the vacancy at the effective date and time of the resignation. The resigning official shall not vote on the appointment. (4) Except as provided in subsection (5), if the township board does not make an appointment under subsection (3), or if a vacancy occurs in an elective township office and the vacancy is not filled by the township board or the board of county election commissioners within 45 days after the beginning of the vacancy, the county clerk of the county in which the township is located shall call a special election within 5 calendar days to fill the vacancy. Not later than 4 p.m. on the fifteenth calendar day after the county clerk calls a special election under this section, the county party committee for each political party in the county in which the township is located shall submit a nominee to fill the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 vacancy. The special election must be held on the next regular election date that is not less fewer than 60 days after the deadline for submitting nominees under this section or 70 days after the deadline for submitting nominees under this section if the next regular election date is the even year August May primary or the general November election. Notice of the special election must be given in the same manner required by section 653a. A special election called under this section does not affect the rights of a qualified elector to register for any other election. An individual elected to fill a vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term. (5) Subsection (4) does not apply to the office of township constable. If a vacancy occurs in the office of township constable, the township board shall determine if and when the vacancy is filled by appointment. If the township board does not fill the vacancy by appointment, the office of township constable must remain remains vacant until the next general or special election in which township offices are filled. Sec. 409a. A general nonpartisan primary election shall must be held in every appellate court district of this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election in which judges of the court of appeals are to be elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of the court of appeals. : Provided, however, That if, If, upon the expiration of the time for filing petitions for the primary election of said the judge of the court of appeals in any appellate court district, it shall appear appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 persons individuals to be elected, then the secretary of state shall certify to the county board or boards of election commissioners the names of such the candidates for court of appeals judge whose nominating petitions, filing fee, or affidavit of candidacy have been properly filed, and such those candidates shall be are the nominees for judge of the court of appeals and shall must be so certified. As to such that office, there shall must not be no a primary election and this office shall must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 409b. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of a qualified person individual other than an incumbent judge of the court of appeals as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the court of appeals upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the appellate court district as determined under section 544f. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. The secretary of state shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary. (2) Nominating petitions filed under this section are valid only if they the nominating petitions clearly indicate for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with subsection (8): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (b) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (c) A new judgeship. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) Nominating petitions specifying a new or existing court of appeals judgeship may not be used to qualify a candidate for another judicial office of the same court in the same judicial district. A person An individual who files nominating petitions for election to more than 1 court of appeals judgeship has not more than 3 days following the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (4) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for shall post on the department of state's website a written statement of office designation to correspond to the applicable judgeship. sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (5) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position subsequent to the deadline must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (6) An incumbent judge of the court of appeals may become a candidate in the primary election for the office of which he or she the judge is the incumbent by filing with the secretary of state an 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 affidavit of candidacy not less than 134 days before the date of the primary election. However, if an incumbent judge of the court of appeals was appointed to fill a vacancy and the judge entered upon the duties of the office less than 137 days before the date of the primary election but before the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary election, the incumbent judge may file the affidavit of candidacy not more than 3 days after entering upon the duties of office. The affidavit of candidacy must contain statements that the affiant is an incumbent judge of the court of appeals, is domiciled within the district, will not attain the age of 70 by the date of election, and is a candidate for election to the office of judge of the court of appeals. (7) In the primary and general November election for 2 or more judgeships of the court of appeals in a judicial district, each of the following categories of candidates must be listed separately on the ballot, consistent with subsection (8): (a) The names of candidates for the judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is seeking election. (b) The names of candidates for the judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is not seeking election. (c) The names of candidates for a newly created judgeship or judgeships. (8) If Subject to subsection (9), if the death or disqualification of an incumbent judge triggers the application of section 409d(2), then for the purposes of subsections (2) and (7), that judgeship must be regarded as a judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. The application of this subsection includes, but is not limited to, circumstances in which the governor appoints an individual to fill the vacancy and that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 individual seeks to qualify as a nominee under section 409d(2). (9) If an open seat for the office of judge of the court of appeals is filled by appointment while nominating petitions are being circulated for that office, the nominating petition signatures obtained before the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office are valid as long as the nominating petitions identify the office sought as a nonincumbent position. On the date the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the nominating petitions may identify the office sought as either an incumbent position or a nonincumbent position. After the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the office sought switches from a nonincumbent position to an incumbent position, and the nominating petition signatures obtained after the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office must be obtained on nominating petitions that identify the office sought as an incumbent position. Sec. 412. A general nonpartisan primary election shall must be held in every county of this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August prior to May before the general election at which judges of the circuit court are elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of the circuit court. If, upon the expiration of the time for filing petitions or incumbency affidavits of candidacy for the primary election of said the judge of the circuit court in any judicial circuit, it shall appear appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, then the secretary of state shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the name of such the candidate for circuit court 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 judge whose petitions or affidavits have been properly filed, and such the candidate shall be is the nominee for the judge of the circuit court and shall must be so certified. As to such that office, there shall must not be no a primary election and this office shall must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 424a. (1) In the primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships of the circuit court, each of the following categories of candidates shall must be listed separately on the ballot, consistent with subsection (3): (a) The names of candidates for the judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is seeking election. (b) The names of candidates for an existing judgeship or judgeships for which the incumbent is not seeking election. (c) The names of candidates for a newly created judgeship or judgeships. (2) Nominating petitions filed under section 413 are valid only if they the nominating petitions clearly indicate for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with subsection (3): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (b) A new judgeship. (c) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (3) If the death or disqualification of an incumbent judge triggers the application of section 415(2), then for the purposes of subsections (1) and (2), that judgeship shall must be regarded as a judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. The application of this subsection includes, but is not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 limited to, circumstances in which the governor appoints an individual to fill the vacancy and that individual seeks to qualify as a nominee under section 415(2). (4) A person An individual who files nominating petitions for election to more than 1 circuit judgeship shall have has not more than 3 days following the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (5) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for shall post on the department of state's website a written statement of office designation to correspond to the applicable judgeship. sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state shall must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (6) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position subsequent to the deadline shall must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected prior to before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (7) If an open seat for the office of judge of the circuit court is filled by appointment while nominating petitions are being circulated for that office, the nominating petition signatures 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 obtained before the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office are valid as long as the nominating petitions identify the office sought as a nonincumbent position. On the date the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the nominating petitions may identify the office sought as either an incumbent position or a nonincumbent position. After the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the office sought switches from a nonincumbent position to an incumbent position, and the nominating petition signatures obtained after the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office must be obtained on nominating petitions that identify the office sought as an incumbent position. Sec. 432. A general nonpartisan primary election shall must be held in every county of this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election at which judges of probate are to be elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of probate. If, upon the expiration of the time for filing petitions or incumbency affidavits of candidacy for the primary election of said the probate judges in any county, it shall appear appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, then the county clerk shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the name of such the candidate for probate judge whose petitions have been properly filed, and such the candidate shall be is the nominee for the judge of probate and shall must be so certified. As to such that office, there shall must not be no a primary election and this office shall must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 433. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, to obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of probate upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the county clerk of each county nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the county as determined under section 544f or by the filing of an affidavit according to section 433a. In the case of a probate court district, to obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of probate upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the probate court district as determined under section 544f or by the filing of an affidavit according to section 433a. The county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. (2) Nominating petitions filed under this section are valid only if they clearly indicate for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with section 435a(2): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (b) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is not seeking election. (c) A new judgeship. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (3) A person An individual who files nominating petitions for election to more than 1 probate judgeship has not more than 3 days following the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (4) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for shall post on the department of state's website a written statement of office designation to correspond to the applicable judgeship. sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (5) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position after the deadline must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (6) If an open seat for the office of judge of probate is filled by appointment while nominating petitions are being circulated for that office, the nominating petition signatures obtained before the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office are valid as long as the nominating petitions identify the office sought as a nonincumbent position. On the date the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 office, the nominating petitions may identify the office sought as either an incumbent position or a nonincumbent position. After the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the office sought switches from a nonincumbent position to an incumbent position, and the nominating petition signatures obtained after the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office must be obtained on nominating petitions that identify the office sought as an incumbent position. (7) (6) If a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of probate receives incorrect or inaccurate written information from the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f and that incorrect or inaccurate written information is published or distributed by the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state, the candidate may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for equitable relief. A court may grant equitable relief to a candidate under this subsection if all of the following occur: (a) The candidate brings the action for equitable relief within not later than 6 days after the candidate is notified by the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state that the candidate's nominating petition contains insufficient signatures. (b) The candidate files an affidavit certifying that he or she the candidate contacted and received from the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state published or distributed the incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f before the filing deadline under subsection (1). (d) The county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state did not inform the candidate at least 14 days before the filing deadline under subsection (1) that incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f had been published or distributed. (8) (7) If a court grants equitable relief to a candidate under subsection (6), (7), the candidate must be given the opportunity to obtain additional nominating petition signatures to meet the requirements under section 544f. The additional nominating petition signatures obtained by a candidate must be filed with the county clerk or, in the case of a probate court district, the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date that the court order granting equitable relief is filed. (9) (8) The nominating petition signatures filed under this section are subject to challenge as provided in section 552. Sec. 467a. A general nonpartisan primary election must be held in every district and election division of this state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August May before the general election at which judges of the district court are elected, at which time the qualified and registered electors may vote for nonpartisan candidates for judge of the district court. If upon the expiration of the time for filing petitions of candidacy for the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 primary election of the judge of the district court in any district or election division, it appears that there are not to exceed twice the number of candidates as there are persons individuals to be elected, the secretary of state shall certify to the county board of election commissioners the name of those candidates for district court judge whose petitions or affidavits of candidacy have been properly filed and those candidates are the nominees for the judge of the district court and must be so certified. As to that office, there must not be a primary election and this office must be omitted from the judicial primary ballot. Sec. 467b. (1) To obtain the printing of the name of a person an individual as a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the district court upon on the official nonpartisan primary ballots, there must be filed with the secretary of state nominating petitions containing the signatures, addresses, and dates of signing of a number of qualified and registered electors residing in the judicial district or division as determined under section 544f. An incumbent district court judge may also become a candidate by the filing of an affidavit in lieu of petitions according to section 467c. The secretary of state shall receive nominating petitions up to 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday before the primary. The provisions of sections 544a and 544b apply. (2) Nominating petitions filed under this section are valid only if they the nominating petitions clearly indicate for which of the following offices the candidate is filing, consistent with section 467c(4): (a) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent judge is seeking election. (b) An unspecified existing judgeship for which the incumbent 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 judge is not seeking election. (c) A new judgeship. (3) A person An individual who files nominating petitions for election to more than 1 district judgeship has not more than 3 days following the close of filing to withdraw from all but 1 filing. (4) In a primary and general election for 2 or more judgeships where more than 1 of the categories in subsection (2) could be selected, a candidate shall apply to the bureau of elections for shall post on the department of state's website a written statement of office designation to correspond to the applicable judgeship. sought by the candidate. The office designation provided by the secretary of state must be included in the heading of all nominating petitions. Nominating petitions containing an improper office designation are invalid. (5) The secretary of state shall issue an office designation of incumbent position for any judgeship for which the incumbent judge is eligible to seek reelection. If an incumbent judge does not file an affidavit of candidacy by the deadline, the secretary of state shall notify all candidates for that office that a nonincumbent position exists. All nominating petitions circulated for the nonincumbent position after the deadline must bear an office designation of nonincumbent position. All signatures collected before the affidavit of candidacy filing deadline may be filed with the nonincumbent nominating petitions. (6) If an open seat for the office of judge of the district court is filled by appointment while nominating petitions are being circulated for that office, the nominating petition signatures obtained before the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office are valid as long as the nominating 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 petitions identify the office sought as a nonincumbent position. On the date the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the nominating petitions may identify the office sought as either an incumbent position or a nonincumbent position. After the date on which the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office, the office sought switches from a nonincumbent position to an incumbent position, and the nominating petition signatures obtained after the appointee files an affidavit of candidacy for that office must be obtained on nominating petitions that identify the office sought as an incumbent position. (7) (6) If a candidate for nomination for the office of judge of the district court receives incorrect or inaccurate written information from the secretary of state or the bureau of elections concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f and that incorrect or inaccurate written information is published or distributed by the secretary of state or the bureau of elections, the candidate may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for equitable relief. A court may grant equitable relief to a candidate under this subsection if all of the following occur: (a) The candidate brings the action for equitable relief within 6 days after the candidate is notified by the secretary of state or the bureau of elections that the candidate's nominating petition contains insufficient signatures. (b) The candidate files an affidavit certifying that he or she the candidate contacted and received from the secretary of state or the bureau of elections incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (c) The secretary of state or the bureau of elections published or distributed the incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f before the filing deadline under subsection (1). (d) The secretary of state or bureau of elections did not inform the candidate at least 14 days before the filing deadline under subsection (1) that incorrect or inaccurate written information concerning the number of nominating petition signatures required under section 544f had been published or distributed. (8) (7) If a court grants equitable relief to a candidate under subsection (6), (7), the candidate must be given the opportunity to obtain additional nominating petition signatures to meet the requirements under section 544f. The additional nominating petition signatures obtained by a candidate must be filed with the secretary of state no later than 4 p.m. on the fifth business day after the date that the court order granting equitable relief is filed. (9) (8) The nominating petition signatures filed under this section are subject to challenge as provided in section 552. Sec. 510. (1) Until December 31, 2022, at least once a month, the county clerk shall forward a list of the last known address and birth date of all individuals over 17-1/2 years of age who have died in the county to the clerk of each city or township in the county. The city or township clerk shall compare this list with the registration records and cancel the registration of the deceased electors. (1) (2) Beginning January 1, 2023, and except Except as otherwise provided in subsections (5) and (6), and (7), at least 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 once a month, and not later than the second business day of each month, each county clerk shall update the qualified voter file to initiate the cancellation of the voter registration of all individuals over 17-1/2 years of age who have died in the county. (2) (3) Beginning January 1, 2023, each Each time a county clerk updates the qualified voter file under subsection (2), (6), or (7), (1), (5), or (6), the secretary of state shall, within not later than 24 hours after the qualified voter file is updated, send an electronic notification to the appropriate city or township clerk regarding each initiated cancellation of voter registration in that city or township. (3) (4) Beginning January 1, 2023, upon Upon receiving an electronic notification under subsection (3), (2), the city or township clerk shall compare the electronic notification with the voter registration records in that city or township and complete the cancellation of the voter registration of each deceased elector in that city or township. (4) (5) Beginning January 1, 2023, if If the secretary of state updates the qualified voter file to cancel the voter registration of any deceased elector, the secretary of state shall, within not later than 24 hours after the qualified voter file is updated, send an electronic notification to the appropriate city or township clerk regarding each canceled voter registration in that city or township. The secretary of state shall notify each appropriate city or township clerk of any voter registration that needs to be canceled after 4 p.m. on the day before an election so that the city or township clerk can cancel the voter registration. (5) (6) Beginning January 1, 2023, on On the first Friday in July April before an August a May election and continuing until 16 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 days before that August May election, each county clerk shall update the qualified voter file by the close of business each Friday before that August May election to initiate the cancellation of the voter registration of all individuals over 17-1/2 years of age who have died in the county. Beginning January 1, 2023, on On the first Friday in October before a November election and continuing until 16 days before that November election, each county clerk shall update the qualified voter file by the close of business each Friday before that November election to initiate the cancellation of the voter registration of all individuals over 17-1/2 years of age who have died in the county. (6) (7) Beginning January 1, 2023, 15 Fifteen days before each August May and November election and continuing until the day before each August May and November election, each county clerk shall update the qualified voter file by the close of business each business day before the August May or November election to initiate the cancellation of the voter registration of all individuals over 17-1/2 years of age who have died in the county. Each county clerk shall notify each appropriate city or township clerk in the county of any voter registration that needs to be canceled after 4 p.m. on the day before an August a May or November election so that the city or township clerk can cancel the voter registration. (7) (8) Upon receiving notice that an elector in the city or township has died and determining that the elector was issued an absent voter ballot, the clerk of that city or township shall make the clerk's best effort to remove the absent voter ballot return envelope or any ballot returned by that elector from processing and spoil the ballot for that elector. Sec. 534. A general primary of all political parties except as 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 provided in sections 532 and 685 must be held in every election precinct in this state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August May before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered voters of each political party may vote for party candidates for the office of governor, United States Senator, Representative in Congress, state senator, representative in the legislature, county executive, prosecuting attorney, sheriff, county clerk, county treasurer, register of deeds, drain commissioner, public works commissioner, county road commissioner, county mine inspector, surveyor, and candidates for office in townships. A nomination for an office must be made only if the official is to be elected at the next succeeding general November election. Sec. 535. A general primary shall must be held in every election precinct in this state on the first Tuesday succeeding after the first Monday in August preceding May before every general November election, at which time the qualified and registered voters may vote for nonpartisan candidates for the office of judge of the court of appeals, judge of the circuit court, judge of probate, and for circuit court commissioner in the years in which such that those officers are to be elected. Sec. 544c. (1) A nominating petition must be 8-1/2 inches by 14 inches in size. On a nominating petition, the words "nominating petition" must be printed in 24-point boldface type. "We, the undersigned," et cetera must be printed in 8-point type. "Warning" and language in the warning must be printed in 12-point boldface type. The balance of the petition must be printed in 8-point type. The name, address, and party affiliation of the candidate and the office for which petitions are signed must be printed in type not 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 larger than 24-point. The petition must be in the following form: NOMINATING PETITION (PARTISAN) We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voters electors of the city or township of .................. , in the county (strike 1) of ................... and state of Michigan, nominate, .............................................................. , (Name of Candidate) .............................................................. , (Street Address or Rural Route) (City or Township) as a candidate of the ................... party for the office of .......................... , .............................................................. , (District, if any) to be voted for at the primary election to be held on the ............ day of ............. , 20 ........ . WARNING A person An individual who knowingly signs more petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office, signs a petition more than once, or signs a name other than his or her the individual's own name is violating the provisions of the Michigan election law. Printed Street Address Name and or Date of Signing Signature Rural Route Zip Code Mo. Day Year 1. _______________________________________________________________ 2. _______________________________________________________________ 3. _______________________________________________________________ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 4. _______________________________________________________________ numbered lines as above CERTIFICATE OF CIRCULATOR The undersigned circulator of the above petition asserts that he or she the circulator is 18 years of age or older and a United States citizen; that each signature on the petition was signed in his or her the circulator's presence; that he or she the circulator has neither caused nor permitted a person an individual to sign the petition more than once and has no knowledge of a person an individual signing the petition more than once; and that, to his or her the circulator's best knowledge and belief, each signature is the genuine signature of the person individual purporting to sign the petition, the person individual signing the petition was at the time of signing a registered elector of the city or township listed in the heading of the petition, and the elector was qualified to sign the petition. CirculatorâDo not sign or date certificate until after circulating petition. ____ If the circulator is not a resident of Michigan, the circulator shall make a cross or check mark on the line provided, otherwise each signature on this petition sheet is invalid and the signatures will not be counted by a filing official. By making a cross or check mark on the line provided, the undersigned circulator asserts that he or she the circulator is not a resident of Michigan and agrees to accept the jurisdiction of this state for the purpose of any legal proceeding or hearing that concerns a petition sheet executed by the circulator and agrees that legal process served on the secretary of state or a designated agent of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the secretary of state has the same effect as if personally served on the circulator. ________________________________________________ (Printed Name and Signature of Circulator) (Date) ________________________________________________ (Complete Residence Address (Street and Number or Rural Route)) Do not enter a post office box ________________________________________________ (City or Township, State, Zip Code) ________________________________________________ (County of Registration, if Registered to Vote, of a Circulator who is not a Resident of Michigan) Warning-A circulator knowingly making a false statement in the above certificate, a person an individual not a circulator who signs as a circulator, or a person an individual who signs a name other than his or her the individual's own name as circulator is guilty of a misdemeanor. (2) The petition must be in a form providing a space for the circulator and each elector who signs the petition to print his or her the circulator's or elector's name. The secretary of state shall prescribe the location of the space for the printed name. The failure of the circulator or an elector who signs the petition to print his or her the circulator's or elector's name, to print his or her the circulator's or elector's name in the location prescribed by the secretary of state, or to enter a zip code or his or her the circulator's or elector's correct zip code does not affect the validity of the signature of the circulator or the elector who signs the petition. A printed name located in the space prescribed for printed names does not constitute the signature of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the circulator or elector. If an elector does not include his or her the elector's signature, his or her the elector's street address or rural route, or the date of signing on the petition as required under subsection (1), the elector's signature is invalid and must not be counted by a filing official. (3) If the circulator of a petition under section 482, a qualifying petition for an office named in section 590b(4), 590b(2), or a petition to form a new political party under section 685 is not a resident of this state, the circulator shall indicate where provided on the certificate of circulator that he or she the circulator agrees to accept the jurisdiction of this state for the purpose of any legal proceeding or hearing initiated under section 476, 552, 590f(2), or 685 that concerns a petition sheet executed by the circulator and agrees that legal process served on the secretary of state or a designated agent of the secretary of state has the same effect as if personally served on the circulator. (4) If the secretary of state or a designated agent of the secretary of state is served with legal process as described in subsection (3), the secretary of state shall promptly notify the circulator by personal service or certified mail at the circulator's residential address as indicated in the certificate of circulator. (5) The circulator of a petition shall sign and date the certificate of circulator before the petition is filed. A circulator shall not obtain electors' signatures after the circulator has signed and dated the certificate of circulator. A filing official shall not count electors' signatures that were obtained after the date the circulator signed the certificate or that are contained in a petition that the circulator did not sign 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 and date. (6) Except as provided in section 544d, a petition sheet must not be circulated in more than 1 city or township and each signer of a petition sheet must be a registered elector of the city or township indicated in the heading of the petition sheet. The invalidity of 1 or more signatures on a petition does not affect the validity of the remainder of the signatures on the petition. (7) An individual shall not sign more nominating petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to be elected to the office. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor. (8) An individual shall not do any of the following: (a) Sign a petition with a name other than his or her the individual's own name. (b) Make a false statement in a certificate on a petition. (c) If not a circulator, sign a petition as a circulator. (d) Sign a name as circulator other than his or her the individual's own name. (9) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10), an individual who violates subsection (8) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for not more than 93 days, or both. (10) An individual shall not sign a petition with multiple names. An individual who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony. (11) If after a canvass and a hearing on a petition under section 476 or 552 the board of state canvassers determines that an individual has knowingly and intentionally failed to comply with subsection (8) or (10), the board of state canvassers may impose 1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or more of the following sanctions: (a) Disqualify obviously fraudulent signatures on a petition form on which the violation of subsection (8) or (10) occurred, without checking the signatures against local registration records. (b) Disqualify from the ballot a candidate who committed, aided or abetted, or knowingly allowed the violation of subsection (8) or (10) on a petition to nominate that candidate. (12) If an individual violates subsection (8) or (10) and the affected petition sheet is filed, each of the following who knew of the violation of subsection (8) or (10) before the filing of the affected petition sheet and who failed to report the violation to the secretary of state, the filing official, if different, the attorney general, a law enforcement officer, or the county prosecuting attorney is guilty of a misdemeanor , punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for not more than 1 year, or both: (a) The circulator of the petition, if different than the individual who violated subsection (8) or (10). (b) If the petition is a nominating petition, the candidate whose nomination is sought. (c) If the petition is a petition for a ballot question or recall, the organization or other person sponsoring the petition drive. (13) If after a canvass and a hearing on a petition under section 476 or 552 the board of state canvassers determines that an individual has violated subsection (12), the board of state canvassers may impose 1 or more of the following sanctions: (a) Impose on the organization or other person sponsoring the petition drive an administrative fine of not more than $5,000.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (b) Charge the organization or other person sponsoring the petition drive for the costs of canvassing a petition form on which a violation of subsection (8) or (10) occurred. (c) Disqualify an organization or other person described in subdivision (a) from collecting signatures on a petition for a period of not more than 4 years. (d) Disqualify obviously fraudulent signatures on a petition form on which a violation of subsection (8) or (10) occurred without checking the signatures against local registration records. (e) Disqualify from the ballot a candidate who committed, aided or abetted, or knowingly allowed a violation of subsection (8) or (10) on a petition to nominate that candidate. (14) If an individual refuses to comply with a subpoena of the board of state canvassers in an investigation of an alleged violation of subsection (8), (10), or (12), the board of state canvassers may hold the canvass of the petitions in abeyance until the individual complies. (15) A person An individual who aids or abets another in an act that is prohibited by this section is guilty of that act. (16) The provisions of this section except as otherwise expressly provided apply to all petitions circulated under authority of the election law. Sec. 551. Until December 31, 2013, the secretary of state and the various county, township, and city clerks shall receive nominating petitions or filing fees filed under this act up to 4 p.m., eastern standard time, of the twelfth Tuesday before the August primary. Beginning January 1, 2014, the The secretary of state and the various county, township, and city clerks shall receive nominating petitions or filing fees filed under this act up 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 to 4 p.m. , eastern standard time, of the fifteenth Tuesday before the August May primary. The provisions of this This section do does not apply to a city that does not nominate its officers under the provisions of this act. Sec. 559. It shall be is the duty of the board of election commissioners of each county in this state to prepare and furnish the necessary official primary election ballots, except for city offices, which that may be required for use by the electors of any political party at the August May primary. Sec. 590b. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) and subject to the requirements prescribed in subsections (3) and (4), a qualifying petition for an office shall be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of the district that is represented by the office being sought by the candidate equal to not less than 2% of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the district at the last election in which a governor was elected. In any case, at least 15 signatures shall be submitted. (2) Subject to the requirements of subsections (3) and (4), if a qualifying petition is for a statewide elective office, the qualifying petition shall be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of this state equal to not less than 1% of the total number of votes cast for all candidates for governor at the last election in which a governor was elected. (1) (3) All signatures on a qualifying petition shall must be obtained not more than 180 days immediately before the date of filing under section 590c. (2) (4) As part of the minimum number of required signatures under this section, a qualifying petition for the office of 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 president President of the United States, United States senator, Senator, governor, attorney general, secretary of state, state board of education, board of regents of the university University of Michigan, board of trustees of Michigan state university, State University, board of governors of Wayne state university, State University, or justice of the supreme court shall must be signed by at least 100 registered electors in each of at least 1/2 of the congressional districts of the this state. Sec. 590c. (1) A qualifying petition for an office shall must be filed with the filing officer authorized to receive a partisan nominating petition or a certificate of nomination for that office. (2) A qualifying petition for an office elected at the general November election shall must be filed not later than 4 p.m. of the one hundred-tenth twenty-first day before the general May primary election. A qualifying petition for an official elected at an election other than the general November election shall must be filed not later than the deadline established by statute or charter for filing a partisan petition or certificate of nomination for the office or at least 90 days before that election, whichever is later. (3) A candidate who files a qualifying petition shall is not be permitted to withdraw his or her the candidacy unless a written notice of withdrawal is filed with the filing officer who received the petition. The written notice shall of withdrawal must be filed not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for filing a qualifying petition. Sec. 590d. (1) Not later than 66 90 days before the general November election, a candidate without political party affiliation for the office of governor shall file with the secretary of state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the name of the person individual who shall appear on the ballot as candidate for lieutenant governor under section 706. This filing shall must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. A candidate for lieutenant governor shall must meet the qualifications of section 51. If a candidate for governor fails to comply with this subsection, the secretary of state shall not certify his or her the candidate's name for printing on the general November election ballot. (2) Not later than 66 90 days before the general November election, a candidate without political party affiliation for the office of president President of the United States shall file with the secretary of state the names and addresses of persons individuals chosen to be presidential electors and the name of the person individual who shall appear on the ballot as candidate for vice-president Vice President of the United States under section 706. Presidential electors certified under this subsection shall must meet the qualifications of section 41. The number of electors chosen shall must equal the number of electors permitted by law. This filing shall must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. If a candidate for president President of the United States fails to comply with this subsection, the secretary of state shall not certify his or her the candidate's name for printing on the general November election ballot. Sec. 591. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) and section 532, the state convention of all political parties for the nomination of candidates for state offices in the even numbered years shall must commence not less fewer than 60 90 days before the general November election. The date, time, and location of the state convention shall must be designated by the state central 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 committees of the various political parties in their call for a state convention. The calls shall must be issued at least 60 days before the August May primaries. (2) In 2012 only, the state convention of all political parties for the nomination of candidates for state offices shall commence not less than 58 days before the general November election. The date, time, and location of the state convention shall be designated by the state central committees of the various political parties in their call for a state convention. The calls shall be issued at least 60 days before the August primaries. Sec. 592. (1) Except as provided in section 532, the county conventions of all political parties for the election of delegates to a state convention for the nomination of state officers in the even numbered years shall must be held not less fewer than 8 30 days nor more than 25 60 days after the August primaries.May primary. (2) All county conventions of a political party shall must be held on the same day throughout the this state. The date shall must be designated by the state central committee of a political party in its call for the state convention. The place and hour of meeting of a county convention shall must be designated in the call issued by the county committee of the political party in the county, which call shall must be issued not less fewer than 45 15 days before the August primaries. after the call to convention issued by the state central committee of the political party for the county committee. The number of delegates to the state convention to which that the political party in the county is entitled shall to must be chosen at the county convention. (3) In all counties having or which that may hereafter have 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 or more congressional districts or parts of congressional districts within the boundaries of the county, the congressional districts or a part of a congressional district within the counties shall must each be considered a county within the provisions of this section for the holding of the county conventions provided for in this section, and shall must be in place of the county convention. The nominee for congress Congress of the congressional district in the preceding primary election, the county chairperson, and the county secretary of the several political parties shall constitute a committee in each congressional district to name the temporary chairperson of the first district convention held under this act. Thereafter, the district chairperson shall act as temporary chairperson. The convention shall must organize the same as county conventions and shall must elect delegates to the state convention. The chairperson and secretary of the convention shall certify to the state central committee the names and addresses of the delegates elected, and, when certified, those delegates shall become the delegates from the district to the state convention. Sec. 598. (1) The state central committee of each political party shall, at least 60 150 days before the August primary, general November election, forward by mail or email to the chairperson of each county committee of the political party a copy of the call for the fall state convention of the political party, showing the number of delegates to which that each county is entitled to in the state convention of the political party. The state central committee shall apportion the delegates to the several counties in proportion to the number of votes cast for the candidate of the political party for secretary of state in each county, respectively, at the last preceding November general 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 election. (2) In addition to the number of delegates allocated to each county under subsection (1), the state central committees shall allocate an additional number of delegates equal to the number of incumbent legislators nominated by their political party and residing in the county. Sec. 611. (1) In the year 1956, and each fourth year after 1956, delegates of each political party who were elected to the last prior fall county convention shall reconvene in a county convention. The county conventions, when so convened, shall must elect delegates to a state convention. The number of delegates elected shall must be the same as the number elected to the last prior spring state convention. The county conventions shall must be held at least 90 days prior to before the time set for the holding of the national convention of its political party. All county conventions shall must be held on the same day and time. The time and place shall must be fixed by the state central committee. A state convention composed of delegates elected by the respective county conventions shall must be held in the year 1956, and each fourth year after 1956, at least 60 days before the holding of the national convention of its political party. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Delegates of each political party who were elected to the last prior fall county convention" means precinct delegates elected at the last prior August primary election, persons individuals nominated as candidates for county offices and state legislative offices who are delegates at large to county conventions under section 599(5), and delegates elected under section 622 or 624d to fill a precinct delegate vacancy for the balance of an unexpired 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 term. (b) "Persons "Individuals nominated as candidates for county offices and state legislative offices who are delegates at large to county conventions under section 599(5)" means incumbent county officials, incumbent state legislators, and unsuccessful candidates for county offices and state legislative offices who are candidates at the last prior regular or special election held for the respective office. (3) Delegates to a state convention shall include only those delegates elected at a county convention. Sec. 623a. (1) On or before April February 1 in even numbered years, the chairperson of the county committee or district committee of a congressional district or a part of a congressional district considered a county under section 592 of each political party shall forward by mail or otherwise deliver to the board of election commissioners in that county a certificate showing the number of delegates to the county convention to which each precinct of the county is entitled. The chairperson of the state central committee of a political party shall notify the chairperson of the county committee or district committee of a congressional district or a part of a congressional district considered a county under section 592 of that political party no later than March January 1 in even numbered years that the certificate required by this subsection is to be delivered to the board of election commissioners on or before April February 1 of that year. (2) If the chairperson fails to forward the certificate required by subsection (1) by the day specified, the board of election commissioners shall immediately determine the number of delegates to the county convention that each precinct should elect 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 for the implementation of implementing this act. (3) The allotment of delegates to all precincts in the this state shall must be made to insure, ensure, as near as is practicable, equal apportionment based upon on the total vote cast for the candidate of each political party for either president President of the United States or secretary of state at the last general November election when elections for those offices were held, whichever is later. However, each precinct shall must have at least 1 delegate. (4) The apportionment shall must be based on the precincts as they the precincts exist 180 days before the August May primary election in even numbered years. (5) As many delegates in each precinct as a political party is entitled to according to the certificate authorized by the chairperson of the county committee or the board of election commissioners shall must be elected at the August May primary in even numbered years by direct vote of the registered electors of each political party in the county. Sec. 641. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an election held under this act shall must be held on 1 of the following regular election dates: (a) The February regular election date, which is the fourth Tuesday in February. (b) (a) The May regular election date, which is the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May. (b) The August regular election date, which is the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August. (c) (c) The November regular election date, which is the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 (d) In each presidential election year when a statewide presidential primary election is held, the date of the statewide presidential primary election as provided in section 613a. (2) If an elective office is listed by name in section 643, requiring the election for that office to be held at the general election, and if candidates for the office are nominated at a primary election, the primary election shall must be held on the August May regular election date. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and subsection (4), a special election shall must be held on a regular election date. A special election called by the governor under section 145, 178, 632, 633, or 634 to fill a vacancy or called by the legislature to submit a proposed constitutional amendment as authorized in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963 may, but is not required to be, held on a regular election date. (4) A school district may call a special election to submit a ballot question to borrow money, increase a millage, or establish a bond if an initiative petition is filed with the county clerk. The petition shall must be signed by a number of qualified and registered electors of the district equal to not less than 10% of the electors voting in the last gubernatorial election in that district or 3,000 signatures, whichever number is lesser. Section 488 applies to a petition to call a special election for a school district under this section. In addition to the requirements set forth in section 488, the proposed date of the special election shall must appear beneath the petition heading, and the petition shall must clearly state the amount of the millage increase or the amount of the loan or bond sought and the purpose for the millage 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 increase or the purpose for the loan or bond. The petition shall must be filed with the county clerk by 4 p.m. of the twelfth Tuesday before the proposed date of the special election. The petition signatures shall must be obtained within 60 days before the filing of the petition. Any signatures obtained more than 60 days before the filing of the petition are not valid. If the special election called by the school district is not scheduled to be held on a regular election date as provided in subsection (1), the special election shall must be held on a Tuesday. A special election called by a school district under this subsection shall must not be held within 30 days before or 35 days after a regular election date as provided in subsection (1). A school district may only call 1 special election pursuant to under this subsection in each calendar year. (5) The secretary of state shall direct and supervise the consolidation of all elections held under this act. (6) This section shall be known and may be cited referred to as the "Hammerstrom election consolidation law". Sec. 642a. (1) After December 31, 2004, a city council that adopted a resolution so that its regular election is held on the May regular election date may change its regular election to the odd year general election by adopting a resolution in compliance with section 642. If a city council adopts the resolution in compliance with section 642 to hold its regular election at the odd year general election, after December 31 of the year in which the resolution is adopted, the city's regular election is at the odd year general election. (2) After December 31, 2004, a city council that holds its regular election for city offices annually or in the even year on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the November regular election date may change its regular election schedule to the odd year general election and the odd year primary election by adopting a resolution in compliance with section 642. If a city council adopts the resolution in compliance with section 642, the city's regular election is at the odd year general election and its primary is at the odd year primary election. (3) After December 31, 2010, a city that adopted a resolution so that its regular election primary is held at the September election shall hold its regular election primary at the odd year primary election. (4) After December 31, 2011, a city that holds its regular election for city offices annually or in the odd year on the November regular election date may change its regular election schedule to the even year general election and the even year primary election by adopting a resolution in compliance with section 642. If a city council adopts the resolution in compliance with section 642, after December 31 of the year in which the resolution is adopted, the city's regular election is at the even year general election and its primary is at the even year primary election. (5) After December 31, 2012, a village that adopted a resolution so that its regular election is held at the September election shall hold its regular election at the general November election. (6) After December 31, 2027, a city that holds its regular election primary for a city office annually or in the even year on the August regular primary election date shall hold its regular election primary on the May regular primary election date. Sec. 686a. (1) If a political party entitled to a position on 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 the ballot failed to have at least 1 candidate who polled at least 5% of the total vote cast for all candidates for secretary of state at the last preceding election at which a secretary of state was elected, candidates for that political party shall must be nominated as provided in section 532. County caucuses and state conventions for such these political parties shall must be held not later than the August May primary. (2) County caucuses may nominate candidates for the office of representative Representative in congress, Congress, state senator, and state representative if the offices represent districts contained wholly within the county, and for all county and township offices. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of the caucus, the names and mailing addresses of all candidates so nominated and the offices for which they the candidates were nominated shall must be certified by the chairperson and secretary of the caucus to the county clerk. The certification shall must be accompanied by an affidavit of identity for each candidate named in the certificate as provided in section 558 and a separate written certificate of acceptance of nomination signed by each candidate named on the certificate. The form of the certificate of acceptance shall must be prescribed by the secretary of state. If a candidate is so certified with the accompanying affidavit of identity and certificate of acceptance, the name of the candidate shall must be printed on the ballot for that election. Candidates nominated and certified shall are not be permitted to withdraw. (3) The county caucus may also select the number of delegates to the state convention to which the county is entitled and shall select its own officers and name its own county committee. (4) The state convention shall must be held at the time and 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 place indicated in the call. The convention shall must consist of delegates selected by the county caucuses. The convention may fill vacancies in a delegation from qualified electors of that county present at the convention. The convention may nominate candidates for all state offices. District candidates may be nominated at district caucuses held in conjunction with the state convention attended by qualified delegates of the district. If delegates of a district are not present, a district caucus shall must not be held for that district and candidates shall must not be nominated for that district. Not more than 1 business day after the conclusion of the convention, the names and mailing addresses of the candidates nominated for state or district offices shall must be certified by the chairperson and secretary of the state convention to the secretary of state. The certification shall must be accompanied by an affidavit of identity for each candidate named in the certificate as provided in section 558 and a separate written certificate of acceptance of nomination signed by each candidate named on the certificate. The form of the certificate of acceptance shall must be prescribed by the secretary of state. The names of candidates so certified with accompanying affidavit of identity and certificate of acceptance shall must be printed on the ballot for the forthcoming election. Candidates so nominated and certified shall are not be permitted to withdraw. Sec. 737a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the board of election inspectors shall not count a write-in vote for a person an individual unless that person individual has filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate as provided in this section. The write-in candidate shall file the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate with the filing official for that 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 elective office on or before 4 p.m. on the second Friday immediately before the election. The secretary of state, immediately after the 4 p.m. filing deadline under this subsection, shall prepare and have delivered a list of all persons individuals who have filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate under this subsection, if any, to the appropriate county clerks. A filing official other than the secretary of state who receives a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or list of persons individuals who filed a declaration of intent from another filing official under this subsection shall prepare and have delivered a list of all persons individuals who have filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate to the board of election inspectors in the appropriate precincts before the close of the polls on election day. (2) If a candidate whose name is printed on the official ballot for the election dies or is otherwise disqualified after 4 p.m. on the second Friday immediately before the election, the requirement of filing a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate under subsection (1) does not apply to a write-in candidate. If a death or disqualification has occurred as described in this subsection, the board of election inspectors shall count all write-in votes for write-in candidates for the office sought by the deceased or disqualified candidate. (3) Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to a write-in candidate for precinct delegate. The board of election inspectors shall not count a write-in vote for a write-in candidate for precinct delegate unless that candidate has filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate as provided in this subsection. A write-in candidate for precinct delegate shall file a declaration 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of intent to be a write-in candidate with the county clerk of the county in which that precinct is located on or before 4 p.m. on the Friday immediately before the election or with the board of election inspectors in the appropriate precinct before the close of the polls on election day. A county clerk who receives a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate from a write-in candidate for precinct delegate under this subsection shall prepare and have delivered a list of all persons individuals who have filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate to the city and township clerks for the appropriate precincts before election day. A city or township clerk shall deliver a list of all persons individuals who have filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for precinct delegate to the board of election inspectors in the appropriate precincts before the close of the polls on election day. (4) The secretary of state shall prescribe forms for the declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. Clerks shall maintain a supply of declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate forms in the clerk's office and make the forms available in the polling places during the August May primary for this purpose. The declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate form must include all of the following information: (a) The name of the person individual intending to be a write-in candidate. (b) The elective office that the person individual seeks as a write-in candidate. (c) The residence address of the person individual seeking elective office as a write-in candidate. (d) Other information the secretary of state considers 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 appropriate. Sec. 766. (1) On receipt of any envelope containing the marked ballot of an absent voter, the city or township clerk shall determine whether the ballot is approved for tabulation by verifying both of the following: (a) The elector is a registered elector and has not voted in person in that election. (b) Using the procedures required under section 766a, the signature on the absent voter ballot return envelope agrees sufficiently with the elector's signature on file. (2) Subject to section 510(8), 510(7), if the city or township clerk verifies the information in subsection (1)(a) and (b), the clerk shall approve the absent voter ballot for tabulation and record in the qualified voter file that the absent voter ballot has been approved for tabulation. Subject to subsection (3), if the city or township clerk is not able to verify the information in subsection (1)(a) and (b), the clerk must reject the absent voter ballot return envelope. (3) If a city or township clerk rejects an absent voter ballot return envelope because the signature on the absent voter ballot return envelope is missing or does not agree sufficiently with the elector's signature on file, the elector must be permitted an opportunity to cure the deficiency as provided under section 766a until 5 p.m. on the third day following the election in order for the absent voter ballot, if otherwise valid, to be accepted for tabulation. (4) If an absent voter ballot return envelope that is eligible to be cured is not cured by the close of polls on election day, that absent voter ballot return envelope must be retained at the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 clerk's office, and must not be turned over to the board of election inspectors or to an absent voter counting board. An absent voter ballot return envelope that is cured after the close of the polls on election day, but before 5 p.m. on the third day following the election, must be accepted and the ballot tabulated if the elector has not voted in person in that election. An absent voter ballot return envelope that is not cured by 5 p.m. on the third day following the election remains rejected. (5) On receipt of a cure form, as provided under section 766a, that resolves the signature deficiency on an elector's absent voter ballot return envelope, the clerk shall approve the ballot for tabulation. (6) Not later than the sixth day after election day, each city or township clerk shall deliver the absent voter ballot return envelopes that have been cured under subsection (4) to the county clerk in a ballot container. The absent voter ballots in these cured absent voter ballot return envelopes shall must be tabulated by the county clerk in a meeting of the board of county canvassers. Sec. 963. (1) Within Not later than 35 days after the filing of the recall petition, the filing official with whom the recall petition is filed shall make an official declaration of the sufficiency or insufficiency of the recall petition. If the recall petition is determined to be insufficient, the filing official shall notify the person or organization sponsoring the recall of the insufficiency of the recall petition. It is not necessary to give notification unless the person or organization sponsoring the recall files with the filing official a written notice of sponsorship and a mailing address. (2) If a recall petition is filed under section 960, 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 immediately upon determining that the recall petition is sufficient, but not later than 35 days after the date of filing of the recall petition, the county clerk with whom the recall petition is filed shall call the recall election and proceed under sections 971c to 975. The recall election shall must be held not less fewer than 95 days after the date the recall petition is filed and shall must be held on the next May regular election date or the next November regular election date, whichever occurs first. (3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), if a recall petition is filed under section 959, the filing official with whom the recall petition is filed shall call the recall primary election and proceed under sections 970b to 970g. The recall primary election shall must be held on the next regular election date that is not less fewer than 95 days after the date the recall petition is filed. (4) If a recall petition is filed under section 959 demanding the recall of the governor, the filing official with whom the recall petition is filed shall call a special recall election and proceed under sections 975c to 975g. The special recall election shall must be held not less fewer than 95 days after the date the recall petition is filed and shall must be held on the next May regular election date or the next August November regular election date, whichever occurs first. Sec. 970e. Subject to section 970b, the candidate of each political party receiving the greatest number of votes cast for candidates at the recall primary election as set forth in the report of the board of state canvassers, based on the returns from the various election precincts, shall must be declared the nominee of that political party at the recall general election to be held 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 on the next May regular election date or the next August November regular election date, whichever occurs first. In addition, except as otherwise provided in this section, a candidate without a political party affiliation may qualify for the recall general election by filing a qualifying petition with the officer with whom the recall petitions were filed that contains 10% of the number of signatures required under section 544f within not later than 10 days after the recall general election is scheduled. An individual who was an unsuccessful candidate in the recall primary election may not subsequently file a qualifying petition as a candidate without a political party affiliation for the recall general election. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2028.